Virginia statutes. Title 22.1. Education.
Article 2.1. The Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure.

§ 22.1-305.2.
Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure.

There is hereby established the Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure (the Advisory Board), which shall consist of three legislative members to be appointed as follows: two members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates, one member of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and 21 nonlegislative citizen members to be appointed by the Board of Education. Ten nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be classroom teachers, with at least the following representation: three elementary school teachers, three middle school teachers, and three high school teachers. Three nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be school administrators, one of whom shall be a school principal, one of whom shall be a division superintendent, and one of whom shall be a school personnel administrator. Four nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be faculty members in teacher preparation programs in public or private institutions of higher education, who may represent the arts and sciences. One nonlegislative citizen member of the Advisory Board shall be a member of a school board. One nonlegislative citizen member of the Advisory Board shall be a member of a parent-teacher association. One nonlegislative citizen member of the Advisory Board shall be a representative of the business community, and one nonlegislative citizen member shall be a citizen at large. The Chancellor of the Virginia Community College System or his designee shall serve as an ex officio member of the Advisory Board. The Superintendent of Public Instruction or his designee and the Director of the State Council of Higher Education for Virginia or his designee shall serve as nonvoting ex officio members of the Advisory Board.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall designate a staff liaison to coordinate the activities of the Advisory Board. The Advisory Board shall meet five times per year or upon the request of its chairman or the Board of Education. The Advisory Board shall annually elect a chairman from its membership. Nonlegislative citizen members are not entitled to compensation for their services. Legislative members of the Advisory Board shall be compensated as provided in § 30-19.12. All members shall be reimbursed for all reasonable and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the Advisory Board as provided in §§

2.2-2813

and

2.2-2825

. The funding for the costs of compensation and expenses of the members shall be provided by the Department of Education.

The nonlegislative citizen members of the Advisory Board shall be appointed for three-year terms. Legislative members shall serve terms coincident with their terms of office. No person may be appointed to serve for more than two consecutive terms. Members shall hold office after expiration of their terms until their successors are duly appointed. Appointments to fill vacancies of members, other than by expiration of a term, shall be for the unexpired terms. Such vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointments.

The Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure shall advise the Board of Education and submit recommendations on policies applicable to the qualifications, examination, licensure, and regulation of school personnel including revocation, suspension, denial, cancellation, reinstatement, and renewals of licensure, fees for processing applications, standards for the approval of preparation programs, reciprocal approval of preparation programs, and other related matters as the Board of Education may request or the Advisory Board may deem necessary. The final authority for licensure of school personnel shall remain with the Board of Education.

History.

1990, c. 970; 1992, c. 132; 2014, c. 334; 2017, c. 331; 2019, c. 767.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2019, c. 767, cl. 2 provides: “That, notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the Board of Education shall provide for the issuance of a three-year license to solely teach career and technical education courses or dual enrollment courses at public high schools in the Commonwealth to any individual who (i) is employed as an instructor by an institution of higher education that is accredited by a nationally recognized regional accreditation body, (ii) is teaching in the specific career and technical education or dual enrollment subject area at such institution in which the individual seeks to teach at a public school, and (iii) complies with the requirements set forth in subdivisions D 1 and 3 of § 22.1-298.1 of the Code of Virginia. The Board of Education shall require any such instructor to maintain continuous employment in such position at the institution of higher education as a condition of continued licensure. The provisions of this enactment shall expire on July 1, 2021, however, any license issued pursuant to this act prior to July 1, 2021, shall remain in effect for three years from the date it was issued unless such license is revoked by the Board of Education.”

Acts 2019, c. 767, cl. 3 provides: “That the Advisory Board on Teacher Education and Licensure (the Advisory Board) shall make recommendations relating to licensure qualifications for individuals employed by an institution of higher education (i) to teach career and technical education courses in a high school setting and (ii) to teach dual enrollment courses in a high school setting. In making its recommendations, the Advisory Board shall consider the plan, process, and criteria developed by the State Board for Community Colleges pursuant to subdivision 7 of §

23.1-2904

of the Code of Virginia and criteria used by nationally recognized regional higher education accreditation bodies. The Advisory Board shall report its recommendations to the Board of Education and the Chairmen of the House Committee on Education and the Senate Committee on Education and Health no later than December 1, 2019.”

The 2014 amendments.

The 2014 amendment by c. 334 in the first paragraph substituted “21” for “nineteen” and “Four” for “Two.”

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 331 in the first paragraph, substituted “three legislative members to be appointed as follows: Two members of the House of Delegates to be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Delegates, one member of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules, and 21 nonlegislative citizen members” for “21 members” in the first sentence and inserted “nonlegislative citizen” preceding “member” in the following seven sentences; in the second paragraph, deleted the former last sentence which read “The members of the Advisory Board shall serve without compensation; however, the necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the Advisory Board shall be reimbursed by the Department of Education” and added the last four sentences; and rewrote the third paragraph.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 767, in the first paragraph, inserted “(the Advisory Board),” “The Chancellor of the Virginia Community College System or his designee shall serve as an ex officio member of the Advisory Board” and “for Virginia” and deleted “and the Chancellor of the Virginia Community College System or his designee” preceding “shall serve as nonvoting.”